Illinois, session 104th, SB285.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. This Act may be referred to as Lindsey's Law. 5    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 6changing Section 11-501 as follows: 7    (625 ILCS 5/11-501)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 11-501)8    Sec. 11-501. Driving while under the influence of alcohol, 9other drug or drugs, intoxicating compound or compounds or any 10combination thereof. 11    (a) A person shall not drive or be in actual physical 12control of any vehicle within this State while:13        (1) the alcohol concentration in the person's blood, 14    other bodily substance, or breath is 0.08 or more based on 15    the definition of blood and breath units in Section 16    11-501.2;17        (2) under the influence of alcohol;18        (3) under the influence of any intoxicating compound 19    or combination of intoxicating compounds to a degree that 20    renders the person incapable of driving safely;21        (4) under the influence of any other drug or 22    combination of drugs to a degree that renders the person   SB0285- 2 -LRB104 03855 RLC 13879 b1    incapable of safely driving;2        (5) under the combined influence of alcohol, other 3    drug or drugs, or intoxicating compound or compounds to a 4    degree that renders the person incapable of safely 5    driving;6        (6) there is any amount of a drug, substance, or 7    compound in the person's breath, blood, other bodily 8    substance, or urine resulting from the unlawful use or 9    consumption of a controlled substance listed in the 10    Illinois Controlled Substances Act, an intoxicating 11    compound listed in the Use of Intoxicating Compounds Act, 12    or methamphetamine as listed in the Methamphetamine 13    Control and Community Protection Act; or14        (7) the person has, within 2 hours of driving or being 15    in actual physical control of a vehicle, a 16    tetrahydrocannabinol concentration in the person's whole 17    blood or other bodily substance as defined in paragraph 6 18    of subsection (a) of Section 11-501.2 of this Code. 19    Subject to all other requirements and provisions under 20    this Section, this paragraph (7) does not apply to the 21    lawful consumption of cannabis by a qualifying patient 22    licensed under the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis 23    Program Act who is in possession of a valid registry card 24    issued under that Act, unless that person is impaired by 25    the use of cannabis.26    (b) The fact that any person charged with violating this   SB0285- 3 -LRB104 03855 RLC 13879 b1Section is or has been legally entitled to use alcohol, 2cannabis under the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis 3Program Act, other drug or drugs, or intoxicating compound or 4compounds, or any combination thereof, shall not constitute a 5defense against any charge of violating this Section.6    (c) Penalties.7        (1) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, any 8    person convicted of violating subsection (a) of this 9    Section is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.10        (2) A person who violates subsection (a) or a similar 11    provision a second time shall be sentenced to a mandatory 12    minimum term of either 5 days of imprisonment or 240 hours 13    of community service in addition to any other criminal or 14    administrative sanction.15        (3) A person who violates subsection (a) is subject to 16    6 months of imprisonment, an additional mandatory minimum 17    fine of $1,000, and 25 days of community service in a 18    program benefiting children if the person was transporting 19    a person under the age of 16 at the time of the violation.20        (4) A person who violates subsection (a) a first time, 21    if the alcohol concentration in his or her blood, breath, 22    other bodily substance, or urine was 0.16 or more based on 23    the definition of blood, breath, other bodily substance, 24    or urine units in Section 11-501.2, shall be subject, in 25    addition to any other penalty that may be imposed, to a 26    mandatory minimum of 100 hours of community service and a   SB0285- 4 -LRB104 03855 RLC 13879 b1    mandatory minimum fine of $500.2        (5) A person who violates subsection (a) a second 3    time, if at the time of the second violation the alcohol 4    concentration in his or her blood, breath, other bodily 5    substance, or urine was 0.16 or more based on the 6    definition of blood, breath, other bodily substance, or 7    urine units in Section 11-501.2, shall be subject, in 8    addition to any other penalty that may be imposed, to a 9    mandatory minimum of 2 days of imprisonment and a 10    mandatory minimum fine of $1,250.11    (d) Aggravated driving under the influence of alcohol, 12other drug or drugs, or intoxicating compound or compounds, or 13any combination thereof. 14        (1) Every person convicted of committing a violation 15    of this Section shall be guilty of aggravated driving 16    under the influence of alcohol, other drug or drugs, or 17    intoxicating compound or compounds, or any combination 18    thereof if:19            (A) the person committed a violation of subsection 20        (a) or a similar provision for the third or subsequent 21        time;22            (B) the person committed a violation of subsection 23        (a) while driving a school bus with one or more 24        passengers on board;25            (C) the person in committing a violation of 26        subsection (a) was involved in a motor vehicle crash   SB0285- 5 -LRB104 03855 RLC 13879 b1        that resulted in great bodily harm or permanent 2        disability or disfigurement to another, when the 3        violation was a proximate cause of the injuries;4            (D) the person committed a violation of subsection 5        (a) and has been previously convicted of violating 6        Section 9-3 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 7        Criminal Code of 2012 or a similar provision of a law 8        of another state relating to reckless homicide in 9        which the person was determined to have been under the 10        influence of alcohol, other drug or drugs, or 11        intoxicating compound or compounds as an element of 12        the offense or the person has previously been 13        convicted under subparagraph (C) or subparagraph (F) 14        of this paragraph (1);15            (E) the person, in committing a violation of 16        subsection (a) while driving at any speed in a school 17        speed zone at a time when a speed limit of 20 miles per 18        hour was in effect under subsection (a) of Section 19        11-605 of this Code, was involved in a motor vehicle 20        crash that resulted in bodily harm, other than great 21        bodily harm or permanent disability or disfigurement, 22        to another person, when the violation of subsection 23        (a) was a proximate cause of the bodily harm;24            (F) the person, in committing a violation of 25        subsection (a), was involved in a motor vehicle crash 26        or snowmobile, all-terrain vehicle, or watercraft   SB0285- 6 -LRB104 03855 RLC 13879 b1        accident that resulted in the death of another person, 2        when the violation of subsection (a) was a proximate 3        cause of the death;4            (G) the person committed a violation of subsection 5        (a) during a period in which the defendant's driving 6        privileges are revoked or suspended, where the 7        revocation or suspension was for a violation of 8        subsection (a) or a similar provision, Section 9        11-501.1, paragraph (b) of Section 11-401, or for 10        reckless homicide as defined in Section 9-3 of the 11        Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012;12            (H) the person committed the violation while he or 13        she did not possess a driver's license or permit or a 14        restricted driving permit or a judicial driving permit 15        or a monitoring device driving permit;16            (I) the person committed the violation while he or 17        she knew or should have known that the vehicle he or 18        she was driving was not covered by a liability 19        insurance policy;20            (J) the person in committing a violation of 21        subsection (a) was involved in a motor vehicle crash 22        that resulted in bodily harm, but not great bodily 23        harm, to the child under the age of 16 being 24        transported by the person, if the violation was the 25        proximate cause of the injury; 26            (K) the person in committing a second violation of   SB0285- 7 -LRB104 03855 RLC 13879 b1        subsection (a) or a similar provision was transporting 2        a person under the age of 16; or3            (L) the person committed a violation of subsection 4        (a) of this Section while transporting one or more 5        passengers in a vehicle for-hire. 6        (2)(A) Except as provided otherwise, a person 7    convicted of aggravated driving under the influence of 8    alcohol, other drug or drugs, or intoxicating compound or 9    compounds, or any combination thereof is guilty of a Class 10    4 felony.11        (B) A third violation of this Section or a similar 12    provision is a Class 2 felony. If at the time of the third 13    violation the alcohol concentration in his or her blood, 14    breath, other bodily substance, or urine was 0.16 or more 15    based on the definition of blood, breath, other bodily 16    substance, or urine units in Section 11-501.2, a mandatory 17    minimum of 90 days of imprisonment and a mandatory minimum 18    fine of $2,500 shall be imposed in addition to any other 19    criminal or administrative sanction. If at the time of the 20    third violation, the defendant was transporting a person 21    under the age of 16, a mandatory fine of $25,000 and 25 22    days of community service in a program benefiting children 23    shall be imposed in addition to any other criminal or 24    administrative sanction.25        (C) A fourth violation of this Section or a similar 26    provision is a Class 2 felony, for which a sentence of   SB0285- 8 -LRB104 03855 RLC 13879 b1    probation or conditional discharge may not be imposed. If 2    at the time of the violation, the alcohol concentration in 3    the defendant's blood, breath, other bodily substance, or 4    urine was 0.16 or more based on the definition of blood, 5    breath, other bodily substance, or urine units in Section 6    11-501.2, a mandatory minimum fine of $5,000 shall be 7    imposed in addition to any other criminal or 8    administrative sanction. If at the time of the fourth 9    violation, the defendant was transporting a person under 10    the age of 16 a mandatory fine of $25,000 and 25 days of 11    community service in a program benefiting children shall 12    be imposed in addition to any other criminal or 13    administrative sanction.14        (D) A fifth violation of this Section or a similar 15    provision is a Class 1 felony, for which a sentence of 16    probation or conditional discharge may not be imposed. If 17    at the time of the violation, the alcohol concentration in 18    the defendant's blood, breath, other bodily substance, or 19    urine was 0.16 or more based on the definition of blood, 20    breath, other bodily substance, or urine units in Section 21    11-501.2, a mandatory minimum fine of $5,000 shall be 22    imposed in addition to any other criminal or 23    administrative sanction. If at the time of the fifth 24    violation, the defendant was transporting a person under 25    the age of 16, a mandatory fine of $25,000, and 25 days of 26    community service in a program benefiting children shall   SB0285- 9 -LRB104 03855 RLC 13879 b1    be imposed in addition to any other criminal or 2    administrative sanction.3        (E) A sixth or subsequent violation of this Section or 4    similar provision is a Class X felony. If at the time of 5    the violation, the alcohol concentration in the 6    defendant's blood, breath, other bodily substance, or 7    urine was 0.16 or more based on the definition of blood, 8    breath, other bodily substance, or urine units in Section 9    11-501.2, a mandatory minimum fine of $5,000 shall be 10    imposed in addition to any other criminal or 11    administrative sanction. If at the time of the violation, 12    the defendant was transporting a person under the age of 13    16, a mandatory fine of $25,000 and 25 days of community 14    service in a program benefiting children shall be imposed 15    in addition to any other criminal or administrative 16    sanction.17        (F) For a violation of subparagraph (C) of paragraph 18    (1) of this subsection (d), the defendant, if sentenced to 19    a term of imprisonment, shall be sentenced to not less 20    than one year nor more than 12 years.21        (G) A violation of subparagraph (F) of paragraph (1) 22    of this subsection (d) is a Class 2 felony, for which the 23    defendant, unless the court determines that extraordinary 24    circumstances exist and require probation, shall be 25    sentenced to: (i) a term of imprisonment of not less than 3 26    years and not more than 14 years if the violation resulted   SB0285- 10 -LRB104 03855 RLC 13879 b1    in the death of one person; or (ii) a term of imprisonment 2    of not less than 6 years and not more than 28 years if the 3    violation resulted in the deaths of 2 or more persons; or 4    (iii) a term of imprisonment of not less than 4 years and 5    not more than 20 years if the violation resulted in the 6    death of one person and great bodily harm or permanent 7    disability or disfigurement of one or more other persons.8        (H) For a violation of subparagraph (J) of paragraph 9    (1) of this subsection (d), a mandatory fine of $2,500, 10    and 25 days of community service in a program benefiting 11    children shall be imposed in addition to any other 12    criminal or administrative sanction.13        (I) A violation of subparagraph (K) of paragraph (1) 14    of this subsection (d), is a Class 2 felony and a mandatory 15    fine of $2,500, and 25 days of community service in a 16    program benefiting children shall be imposed in addition 17    to any other criminal or administrative sanction. If the 18    child being transported suffered bodily harm, but not 19    great bodily harm, in a motor vehicle crash, and the 20    violation was the proximate cause of that injury, a 21    mandatory fine of $5,000 and 25 days of community service 22    in a program benefiting children shall be imposed in 23    addition to any other criminal or administrative sanction.24        (J) A violation of subparagraph (D) of paragraph (1) 25    of this subsection (d) is a Class 3 felony, for which a 26    sentence of probation or conditional discharge may not be   SB0285- 11 -LRB104 03855 RLC 13879 b1    imposed. 2        (3) Any person sentenced under this subsection (d) who 3    receives a term of probation or conditional discharge must 4    serve a minimum term of either 480 hours of community 5    service or 10 days of imprisonment as a condition of the 6    probation or conditional discharge in addition to any 7    other criminal or administrative sanction.8    (e) Any reference to a prior violation of subsection (a) 9or a similar provision includes any violation of a provision 10of a local ordinance or a provision of a law of another state 11or an offense committed on a military installation that is 12similar to a violation of subsection (a) of this Section.13    (f) The imposition of a mandatory term of imprisonment or 14assignment of community service for a violation of this 15Section shall not be suspended or reduced by the court.16    (g) Any penalty imposed for driving with a license that 17has been revoked for a previous violation of subsection (a) of 18this Section shall be in addition to the penalty imposed for 19any subsequent violation of subsection (a).20    (h) For any prosecution under this Section, a certified 21copy of the driving abstract of the defendant shall be 22admitted as proof of any prior conviction. 23(Source: P.A. 101-363, eff. 8-9-19; 102-982, eff. 7-1-23.)